Illinois, session 104th, SB2483.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act is 5amended by changing Section 23 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3305/23)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2032)8    Sec. 23. Access and Functional Needs Advisory Committee.9    (a) In this Section, "Advisory Committee" means the Access 10and Functional Needs Advisory Committee.11    (b) The Access and Functional Needs Advisory Committee is 12created.13    (c) The Advisory Committee shall:14        (1) Coordinate meetings occurring, at a minimum, 3 15    times each year, in addition to emergency meetings called 16    by the chairperson of the Advisory Committee.17        (2) Research and provide recommendations for 18    identifying and effectively responding to the needs of 19    persons with access and functional needs before, during, 20    and after a disaster using an intersectional lens for 21    equity.22        (3) Provide recommendations to the Illinois Emergency 23    Management Agency regarding how to ensure that persons   SB2483- 2 -LRB104 11851 BDA 21941 b1    with a disability are included in disaster strategies and 2    emergency management plans, including updates and 3    implementation of disaster strategies and emergency 4    management plans.5        (4) Review and provide recommendations for the 6    Illinois Emergency Management Agency, and all relevant 7    State agencies that are involved in drafting and 8    implementing the Illinois Emergency Operation Plan, to 9    integrate access and functional needs into State and local 10    emergency plans.11    (d) The Advisory Committee shall be composed of the 12Director of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency or his or 13her designee, the Attorney General or his or her designee, the 14Secretary of Human Services or his or her designee, the 15Director of Aging or his or her designee, and the Director of 16Public Health or his or her designee, together with the 17following members appointed by the Governor on or before 18January 1, 2022:19        (1) Two members, either from a municipal or 20    county-level emergency agency or a local emergency 21    management coordinator.22        (2) Nine members from the community of persons with a 23    disability who represent persons with different types of 24    disabilities, including, but not limited to, individuals 25    with mobility and physical disabilities, hearing and 26    visual disabilities, deafness or who are hard of hearing,   SB2483- 3 -LRB104 11851 BDA 21941 b1    blindness or who have low vision, mental health 2    disabilities, and intellectual or developmental 3    disabilities. Members appointed under this paragraph shall 4    reflect a diversity of age, gender, race, and ethnic 5    background.6        (3) Four members who represent first responders from 7    different geographical regions around the State.8    (e) Of those members appointed by the Governor, the 9initial appointments of 6 members shall be for terms of 2 years 10and the initial appointments of 5 members shall be for terms of 114 years. Thereafter, members shall be appointed for terms of 4 12years. A member shall serve until his or her successor is 13appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs in the Advisory 14Committee membership, the vacancy shall be filled in the same 15manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the 16unexpired term. 17    (f) After all the members are appointed, and annually 18thereafter, they shall elect a chairperson from among the 19members appointed under paragraph (2) of subsection (d).20    (g) The initial meeting of the Advisory Committee shall be 21convened by the Director of the Illinois Emergency Management 22Agency no later than February 1, 2022.23    (h) Advisory Committee members shall serve without 24compensation.25    (i) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall provide 26administrative support to the Advisory Committee.  SB2483- 4 -LRB104 11851 BDA 21941 b1    (j) The Advisory Committee shall prepare and deliver a 2report to the General Assembly, the Governor's Office, and the 3Illinois Emergency Management Agency by July 1, 2022, and 4annually thereafter. The report shall include the following:5        (1) Identification of core emergency management 6    services that need to be updated or changed to ensure the 7    needs of persons with a disability are met, and shall 8    include disaster strategies in State and local emergency 9    plans.10        (2) Any proposed changes in State policies, laws, 11    rules, or regulations necessary to fulfill the purposes of 12    this Act.13        (3) Recommendations on improving the accessibility and 14    effectiveness of disaster and emergency communication.15        (4) Recommendations on comprehensive training for 16    first responders and other frontline workers when working 17    with persons with a disability during emergency situations 18    or disasters, as defined in Section 4 of the Illinois 19    Emergency Management Agency Act.20        (5) Any additional recommendations regarding emergency 21    management and persons with a disability that the Advisory 22    Committee deems necessary.23    (k) The annual report prepared and delivered under 24subsection (j) shall be annually considered by the Illinois 25Emergency Management Agency when developing new State and 26local emergency plans or updating existing State and local   SB2483- 5 -LRB104 11851 BDA 21941 b1emergency plans.2    (l) The Advisory Committee shall comply with all 3provisions of the Open Meetings Act except the Advisory 4Committee shall be exempt from the requirements of Section 52.01 of the Open Meetings Act that specifically require a 6quorum of members of a public body to be physically present at 7the location of an open meeting. Notwithstanding Section 2.01 8of the Open Meetings Act, Advisory Committee members shall be 9allowed to attend remotely by video or audio conference with 10all attending members counting toward a quorum, provided there 11is at least one member in physical attendance at the publicly 12posted physical location of the meeting.13    (m) (l) The Advisory Committee is dissolved and this 14Section is repealed on January 1, 2032.15(Source: P.A. 102-361, eff. 8-13-21; 102-671, eff. 11-30-21; 16103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)